Hawaii statutes.
[§346F-12] Special designation of
nursing facility sustainability program special fund. Notwithstanding
section 37-53 and any law or administrative rule to the contrary, the specific
purposes set out in section 346F-4(c) are established as being preeminent uses
of the nursing facility sustainability program special fund and shall not be
used for any other purposes, notwithstanding any authority granted to the
governor or any other state official by any other statutory provisions relating
to the allocation or reallocation of funds. [L 2012, c 156, pt of §2, §5; am L
2013, c 142, §3; am L 2014, c 124, §2; am L 2015, c 69, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next